Hawaii statutes.
§37-68 Responsibilities of agencies. Under
rules as may be prescribed by the director of finance with the approval of the
governor:

(1) Each agency assigned the task of developing
programs and preparing program and financial plans, budgetary requests, and
program performance reports shall develop the programs and prepare the plans,
requests, and reports and submit the same to the director of finance at times,
on forms, and in a manner as the director may prescribe. For informational
purposes, the University of Hawaii shall submit its program and financial
plans, budgetary requests, and program performance reports to the legislature
at the same time the university submits them to the director of finance. Where
new programs are being proposed, each agency shall demonstrate that the
program:

(A) Is an appropriate function of state
government; and, as applicable

(B) Can be implemented by the public sector
as cost-effectively as the private sector while meeting the same plans, goals,
objectives, standards, measures of effectiveness, wage, salary, conditions of
employment, and employee benefit programs of the State;

(2) Each agency administering state programs and each
agency responsible for the formulation of programs and the preparation of
program and financial plans, budgetary requests, and program performance
reports, shall furnish the department of budget and finance all documents and
information as the department may from time to time require. Each agency shall
make available all documents and information, as may be requested, to the
legislature and any member or committee of either house of the legislature;

(3) The director of finance or any employee of the
department of budget and finance, when duly authorized, for the purpose of
securing information, shall have access to and may examine any books,
documents, papers, or records of any agency;

(4) Each agency submitting a capital improvement
project proposal shall furnish the department of budget and finance with an
estimate of operational costs for the proposed capital improvement project and
all documents that support the estimate of operational costs. Each agency
shall make available all documents and related information, as may be
requested, to the legislature and any member or committee of either house.

The director of finance shall provide a
summary of this information in the multi-year program and financial plan and
budget submitted to the legislature before the regular session of each
odd-numbered year and the supplemental budget submitted to the legislature
before the regular session of each even-numbered year; and

(5) Each agency responsible for operating or
maintaining a state-owned building, facility, or other improvement shall
furnish the department of budget and finance with an estimate of the deferred
maintenance costs for the building, facility, or other improvement.

The director of finance shall provide a
summary of this information in the multi-year program and financial plan and
budget submitted to the legislature before the regular session of each
odd-numbered year and the supplemental budget submitted to the legislature
before the regular session of each even-numbered year.

For the purposes of this paragraph,
"deferred maintenance costs" means the costs to catch up on the
repair and maintenance of the state-owned building, facility, or other
improvement that has been delayed past the ordinarily scheduled repair and
maintenance cycle. The department of budget and finance may further refine
this definition in its instructions to the agencies furnishing the information.
[L 1970, c 185, §8; am L 1994, c 263, §1; am L 1998, c 115, §9; am L 2014, c
135, §3; am L 2015, c 150, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next